Arkansas, session 2025, SB248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-19-105(b)(12), concerning the personnel
records exemption from requests for disclosure under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, is amended to read as follows:
(12)(A) Personnel records to the extent that disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; Any portion of
a record, the disclosure of which would constitute a clearly unwarranted
invasion of personal privacy, if the information contained within the public
record concerns:
(i) A private citizen, living or deceased;
(ii) A public official, agent, or employee and is
not related to the performance of his or her official duties; or
(iii) A personnel record of a public official,
agent, or employee.
(B) That portion of a record under subdivision (b)(12)(A)
*LGL073*
02/18/2025 7:55:42 AM LGL073

SB248
of this section that constitutes a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal
privacy shall not be disclosed if:
(i) The information contained within the record is
of a personal or intimate nature sufficient to give rise to a substantial
privacy interest; and
(ii) The substantial privacy interest outweighs the
public's interest in disclosure;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 25-19-105(c)(2), concerning the personnel
records exemption from requests for disclosure under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Any personnel or evaluation records exempt from disclosure
under this chapter or other records exempt from disclosure under subdivision
(b)(12) of this section shall nonetheless be made available to the person
about whom the records are maintained or to that person's designated
representative.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 25-19-105(c)(3)(B)(i), concerning the
personnel records exemption from requests for disclosure under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, is amended to read as follows:
(B)(i) If the subject of the records cannot be contacted in
person, or by telephone, or by electronic message with a confirmed receipt
within the twenty-four-hour period, the custodian shall send written notice
via overnight mail to the subject of the records at his or her last known
address. Either the custodian, requester, or the subject of the records may,
before the close of the Attorney General’s office the following business day,
seek an opinion from the Attorney General, who, within three (3) working days
of receipt of the request, shall issue an opinion stating whether the
decision is consistent with this chapter.







02/18/2025 7:55:42 AM LGL073